test/src/morphology/V-vieqddw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - vie’ddõ: # Verb 24 'eng /est vedada/fin' - full paradigm
     vie’ddõ+V+Inf: vie’ddõ
     vie’ddõ+V+Ger: vie’ddõs
     vie’ddõ+V+Sup: viedām
     vie’ddõ+V+Sup+Ine: viedāmõs
     vie’ddõ+V+Sup+Ela: viedāmõst
     vie’ddõ+V+Sup+Tra: viedāmõks
     vie’ddõ+V+Sup+Abe: viedāmõt
     vie’ddõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viedāb
     vie’ddõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viedāt
     vie’ddõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viedābõd
     vie’ddõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viedīz
     vie’ddõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [viedīzt, viedīztõ]
     vie’ddõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [viedīzt, viedīztõ]
     vie’ddõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: vie’d
     vie’ddõ+V+Cond+Sg3: viedāks
     vie’ddõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: viedā
     vie’ddõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: vie’ddõ
     vie’ddõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: viedāgid
     vie’ddõ+V+Jus+Sg3: viedāg
     vie’ddõ+V+QuoSg3: viedāji
     vie’ddõ+V+ActPrfPrc: vie’ddõn
     vie’ddõ+V+PssPrfPrc: vie’dtõd
